Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 6 Voluntary Labor Program

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 1/HB 58, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Working Against Recidivism Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 2/HB 58, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Many persons sentenced to confinement for criminal offenses commit additional criminal offenses after release from confinement, and such recidivism is a serious danger to public safety and a major source of expense to the state;

“(2) Under the appropriate conditions and limitations, work programs of voluntary labor by inmates of state and county correctional institutions for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public or private purchasers provide substantial public benefits by:

“(A) Providing job experience and skills to participating inmates;

“(B) Allowing participating inmates to accumulate savings available for their use when released from the correctional institution;

“(C) Lowering recidivism rates;

“(D) Generating taxes from inmate income;

“(E) Reducing the cost of incarceration by enabling participating inmates to pay room and board; and

“(F) Providing participating inmates income to pay fines, restitution, and family support;

“(3)
Appropriate conditions and limitations for voluntary labor by inmates for such work programs include but are not limited to:

“(A) Assurance that inmates’ work is voluntary;

“(B) Payment of inmates at wages at a rate not less than that paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed;

“(C) Provision of federal and state governmental benefits to participating inmates comparable to governmental benefits provided for similarly situated private sector workers;

“(D) Selection of participating inmates with careful attention to security issues;

“(E) Appropriate supervision of inmates during travel or employment outside the correctional institution;

“(F) Assurance that inmate labor will not result in the displacement of employed workers; be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality; or impair existing contracts for services;

“(G) Consultations with local private employers that may be economically impacted; and

“(H) Consultations with local labor union organizations and other local employee groups, especially those who have an interest in the trade or skill to be performed by the inmates; and

“(4)
Requirements for the federal Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program authorized by 18 U.S.C. Section 1761 and federal regulations are sufficient to ensure appropriate conditions and limitations in many areas of concern for programs of voluntary labor by inmates for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public and private purchasers.”

42-5-120.
Rules and regulations; requirements.

The board is authorized to issue and promulgate rules and regulations for programs of voluntary labor by inmates for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public and private purchasers. Such rules and regulations shall be designed to meet the published requirements of the Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program authorized by 18 U.S.C. Section 1761 and federal regulations and to provide other appropriate conditions and limitations. Such rules and regulations may provide for administration and management of such work programs by the department and the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration.

The rules and regulations for the work programs authorized by this article shall include but not be limited to rules requiring:

Assurance that inmates’ work is voluntary and that there shall be no retribution against inmates who do not volunteer;

Payment of inmates at wages at a rate not less than that paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed;

Provision of federal and state governmental benefits to participating inmates comparable to governmental benefits provided for similarly situated private sector employees;

Selection of participating inmates with careful attention to security issues;

Appropriate supervision of inmates during travel and employment outside the correctional institution;

Assurance that inmate labor will not result in the displacement of employed workers; be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality; or impair existing contracts for services;

Consultations with local private businesses that may be economically impacted;

Consultations with local labor union organizations and other local employee groups, especially those who have an interest in the trade or skill to be performed by the inmates; and

Procedures for deductions from inmate wages for federal, state, and local taxes; reasonable charges for room and board; court-ordered child support and voluntary family support; and payments to the Georgia Crime Victims Emergency Fund of not less than 5 percent nor greater than 20 percent of gross wages, in compliance with Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program requirements.

(b.1)

Regulations relating to paragraphs (2) and (6) of subsection (b) of this Code section and relating to whether labor shortages exist shall be promulgated and issued jointly by the board and the Commissioner of Labor.

Notwithstanding the provision of Code Section 50-13-2 exempting the Board of Corrections from the definition of the term “agency” and thus from the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 50-13-4, relating to procedural requirements for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules; the limitation on an action to contest rules; and legislative override of rules to which the members of the General Assembly object.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58; Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 3/HB 313.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP) Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Labor, Employment Services Division, Chapter 300-9-1.

42-5-121.
Federal certification.

The commissioner shall seek certification under the federal Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program authorized by 18 U.S.C. Section 1761 and federal regulations for programs of voluntary labor by inmates for privately owned profit-making employers to produce goods, services, or goods and services for sale to public or private purchasers. After receiving certification, the board shall operate one or more such programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58.

42-5-122.
Conflicting legislation preempted.

Any program for voluntary labor by inmates created in accordance with this article shall not be subject to the provisions of Code Section 42-5-60 prohibiting hiring out inmates to private persons, corporations, and businesses conducted for profit; prohibiting sale of goods, wares, or merchandise manufactured, produced, or mined by inmates to private persons, firms, associations, and corporations; and limiting the amount of compensation for inmates.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58.

42-5-123.
Compensation by employers for administrative and other costs to the state.

The board shall ensure by rules or by contractual provisions that the privately owned profit-making employers compensate the department and the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration for any administrative costs or other costs incurred by the department or the administration for the operation of the program or programs. The board shall ensure by rules or by contractual provisions that the department and the administration are compensated for use of any employees of the department or the administration, use of any space owned by or under the control of the department or the administration, or use of any other resources of the department or the administration in the operation of the program or programs.

Employers that participate in inmate work programs under this article shall be prohibited from providing any thing of value to the Board of Corrections, the Department of Corrections, the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration, or any officer or employee thereof other than the payments authorized by this Code section. The Board of Corrections, the Department of Corrections, the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration, and any officer or employee thereof shall be prohibited from accepting any thing of value, other than the payments authorized by this Code section, from employers that participate in inmate work programs under this article. As used in this Code section, the term “thing of value” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Code Section 16-10-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58; Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 4/HB 313.

42-5-124.
Publicizing and inviting participation in programs; cooperation with the Department of Labor.

Following the issuance and promulgation of rules and regulations, the department and the Georgia Correctional Industries Administration are authorized to publicize the program and invite employers to participate. The department shall rely upon the Georgia Department of Labor for determining whether inmates would be displacing other workers, whether labor shortages exist, and the prevailing local wage for work to be done by inmates. The Georgia Department of Labor is authorized to provide such determinations to the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58; Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 5/HB 313.

42-5-125.
General applicability; exceptions.

Every program involving employment of an inmate, convict, or prisoner by a business operated for profit to manufacture, produce, or mine goods, wares, or merchandise for transportation in interstate commerce or to provide services shall become a part of the programs authorized by this article and shall conform to the rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with this article.

This Code section shall not apply to programs for the production of agricultural commodities, parts for the repair of farm machinery, or goods, wares, or merchandise manufactured for use by not for profit organizations, the federal government, the District of Columbia, or by any state or political subdivision of a state.

This Code section shall not apply to an inmate, convict, or prisoner serving a term of supervised release, as described in 18 U.S.C. Section 3583.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-125

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1222, § 4/HB 58.